Utah statutes.
75-7-503.   Exceptions to spendthrift provision.

(1)  In this section, "child" includes any person for whom an order or judgment for child support has been entered in this or another state.

(2)  Even if a trust contains a spendthrift provision, a beneficiary's child who has a judgment or court order against the beneficiary for support or maintenance, or a judgment creditor who has provided services for the protection of a beneficiary's interest in the trust, may obtain from a court an order attaching present or future distributions to or for the benefit of the beneficiary.

(3)  A spendthrift provision is unenforceable against a claim of this state or the United States to the extent a statute of this state or federal law so provides.



Enacted by Chapter 89, 2004 General Session

